North Carolina, session 2025, SB634.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 8C-1, Rule 804(b), reads as rewritten:
"(b) Hearsay exceptions. – The following are not excluded by the hearsay rule if the
declarant is unavailable as a witness:
…
(6) Statement Offered Against a Party That Wrongfully Caused the Declarant's
Unavailability. – A statement offered against a party that wrongfully caused,
or acquiesced in wrongfully causing, the declarant's unavailability as a witness
and did so intending that result."
SECTION 1.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to trials
beginning on or after that date.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 15-1(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the following misdemeanors shall be
charged within 10 years of the commission of the crime:
…
(6) Those that would require a judge to determine the conditions of pretrial release
under G.S. 15A-534.1(a)."
SECTION 2.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to acts
committed either:
(1) On or after that date.
(2) Before that date, provided that the statute of limitations for the act did not
expire prior to that date.
SECTION 3.(a) Article 73 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 15A-1225.4. Domestic violence victim witnesses; remote testimony.
(a) Definitions:
(1) Criminal proceeding. – Any hearing or trial in a prosecution of a person
charged with violating a criminal law of this State.
(2) Domestic violence. – All cases in which the defendant is charged with assault
on, stalking, communicating a threat to, or committing a crime provided in
Article 7B, 8, 10, or 15 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes upon a spouse
or former spouse, a person with whom the defendant lives or has lived as if
married, or a person with whom the defendant is or has been in a dating
*S634-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
relationship as defined in G.S. 50B-1(b)(6), with domestic criminal trespass,
or with violation of an order entered pursuant to Chapter 50B, Domestic
Violence, of the General Statutes.
(3) Domestic violence victim witness. – An alleged victim in a criminal
proceeding involving a crime of domestic violence.
(4) Remote testimony. – A method by which a domestic violence victim witness
testifies in a criminal proceeding outside of the physical presence of the
defendant.
(b) Remote Testimony Authorized. – In a criminal proceeding, a domestic violence
victim witness who has been found competent to testify may testify, under oath or affirmation,
other than in an open forum if either of the following circumstances occurs:
(1) The defendant does not object pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.
(2) The court determines that remote testimony is appropriate pursuant to
subsection (d) of this section.
(c) Notice and Waiver. – In any criminal proceeding, the testimony of a domestic
violence victim witness shall be permitted by remote testimony if each of the following
circumstances occurs:
(1) The State notifies the attorney of record for the defendant, or the defendant if
that person has no attorney, at least 15 business days before the proceeding at
which the remote testimony would be used of its intention to allow the
domestic violence victim witness to testify remotely.
(2) The defendant's attorney of record, or the defendant if that person has no
attorney, fails to file a written objection with the court, with a copy to the
State, at least five business days before the proceeding at which the remote
testimony will be used that the defendant objects to the domestic violence
victim witness testifying remotely.
If the defendant's attorney of record, or the defendant if that person has no attorney, fails to
file a written objection as provided in this subsection, then the objection shall be deemed waived
and the domestic violence victim witness shall be allowed to testify remotely pursuant to the
standards set forth in subsection (g) of this section.
The court shall make written findings of any waiver under this subsection, including at a
minimum the date and manner of notice provided pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection
and the judicial determination that the defendant or the defendant's attorney, whichever is
applicable, failed to timely object pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection.
(d) Authorized by Court Over Objection. – If a defendant's attorney of record, or the
defendant, objects to remote testimony as provided for in subsection (c) of this section, the court
may authorize remote testimony over the objection if the court determines each of the following:
(1) That the domestic violence victim witness would suffer serious emotional
distress, not by the open forum in general, but by testifying in the defendant's
presence.
(2) That the domestic violence victim's ability to communicate with the trier of
fact would be impaired.
(e) Hearing Procedure. – Upon motion of a party or the court's own motion, and for good
cause shown, the court shall hold a separate evidentiary hearing on a date prior to the proceeding
at which the remote testimony is proposed to be allowed to determine whether to allow remote
testimony. Hearings in the superior court division shall be recorded. The presence of the domestic
violence victim witness is not required at the hearing unless ordered by the presiding judge.
(f) Order. – An order allowing or disallowing the use of remote testimony pursuant to
subsection (e) of this section shall state the findings of fact and conclusions of law that support
the court's determination. An order allowing the use of remote testimony shall at a minimum do
each of the following:
Page 2 Senate Bill 634-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) State the method by which the domestic violence victim witness is to testify.
(2) List any individual or category of individuals allowed to be in, or required to
be excluded from, the presence of the domestic violence victim witness during
the testimony.
(3) State any special conditions necessary to facilitate the cross-examination of
the domestic violence victim witness.
(4) State any condition or limitation upon the participation of individuals in the
domestic violence victim witness's presence during the witness's testimony.
(5) State any other condition necessary for taking or presenting the testimony.
(g) Remote Testimony. – The method used for remote testimony permitted under this
section shall do each of the following:
(1) Allow the judge, jury, and defendant to observe the demeanor of the domestic
violence victim witness as the witness testifies in a similar manner as if the
witness were in the open forum.
(2) Allow the judge, jury, defendant, and domestic violence victim witness to see
and hear one another in real time.
The court shall ensure that the physical location where the domestic violence victim witness
testifies has been mutually agreed to by both the defendant and the State or approved by the court.
The court shall ensure that both the defendant and the State shall be allowed to have at least two
representatives approved by the court, in addition to the prosecutor and defense counsel, present
at the location where the domestic violence victim witness is testifying. The court shall ensure
that the defense counsel, except a pro se defendant, is physically present where the domestic
violence victim witness testifies, has a full and fair opportunity for cross-examination of the
domestic violence victim witness, and has the ability to communicate privately with the
defendant during the remote testimony. If the defendant is an attorney pro se, the court shall
ensure that the defendant has a full and fair opportunity for cross-examination of the domestic
violence victim witness. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the provisions of
G.S. 15A-1225.
(h) Nonexclusive Procedure and Standard. – Nothing in this section shall:
(1) Prohibit the use or application of any other method or procedure authorized or
required by statute, common law, or rule for the introduction into evidence of
the statements or testimony of a domestic violence victim in a criminal or
noncriminal proceeding.
(2) Be construed to require a court, in noncriminal proceedings, to apply the
standard set forth in subsection (g) of this section or to deviate from a standard
or standards authorized by statute, common law, or rule for allowing the use
of remote testimony in noncriminal proceedings."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 7A-49.6(i) reads as rewritten:
"(i) This section is not intended to limit the court's authority to receive remote testimony
pursuant to statutes that otherwise permit it, including G.S. 15A-1225.1, 15A-1225.2,
15A-1225.3, 15A-1225.4, 20-139.1, 8C-1, Rule 616, 50A-111, and 52C-3-315(f)."
SECTION 3.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
testimony provided on or after that date.
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 634-First Edition Page 3